California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(C) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A) and (B), if the child or nonminor
 dependent is determined to be ineligible for the Emergency Assistance Program included in the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families block grant, 70 percent of the cost of emergency payments made to the emergency caregiver shall be funded by the department and 30 percent shall be funded by the county.

(D) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C), payments required to be provided pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be eligible for the federal or state share of cost upon approval or denial of the resource family application, consistent with subdivision (g), or beyond 120 days, whichever occurs first.

(E) Notwithstanding subparagraph (D), the federal and state share of payment made pursuant to this paragraph shall be available beyond 120 days of payments, and up to 365 days of payments, if all of the following conditions are met:

(i) On a monthly basis, the county has documented good cause for delay in approving the resource family application that is outside the direct control of the county, which may include delays in processing background check clearances or exemptions, medical examinations, or delays that are based on the needs of the family.

(ii) On a monthly basis, the deputy director or director of the county child welfare department, or their designees, or the chief probation officer, or their designee, as applicable, has been notified of the delay in approving the resource family application and that notification is documented in the resource family approval file.

(iii) On a monthly basis, the county provides to the department a list of the resource family applications that have been pending for more than 120 days and the reasons for
 the delays.

(5) For emergency or compelling reason placements made during the 2022–23 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter:

(A) Payments shall be made to an emergency caregiver through the Emergency Assistance Program included in the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families block grant.

(B) The county shall be solely responsible for the nonfederal share of cost.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A) and (B), if the child or nonminor dependent is determined to be ineligible for the Emergency Assistance Program included in the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families block grant, 70 percent of the cost of the emergency payments made to the emergency caregiver shall be funded by the department and 30 percent shall be funded by the
 county.

(D) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C), payments required to be provided pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be eligible for the federal or state share of cost upon approval or denial of the resource family application, consistent with subdivision (g), or beyond 120 days, whichever occurs first.

(E) Notwithstanding subparagraph (D), the federal and state share of payment made pursuant to this paragraph shall be available beyond 120 days of payments, and up to 365 days of payments, if all of the following conditions are met:

(i) On a monthly basis, the county has documented good cause for delay in approving the resource family application that is outside the direct control of the county due to processing background check clearances or exemptions or medical examinations, delays in home or grounds
 improvements that are outside the control of the family or county, completion of specialized or individualized training required of the family that are beyond the basic resource family approval requirements, delays related to changes in the home environment resulting in the need for a new assessment, delays related to the time commitments required of the caregiver as a result of the child’s placement into foster care, delays as a result of the applicant exercising due process rights, or delays that are based on the needs of the family.

(ii) On a monthly basis, the deputy director or director of the county child welfare department, or their designees, or the chief probation officer, or their designee, as applicable, has been notified of the delay in approving the resource family application and that notification is documented in the resource family approval file.

(iii) On a monthly
 basis, the county provides to the department a list of the resource family applications that have been pending for more than 120 days, the reasons for the delays, and documentation supporting the good cause determination.

(f) On and after the date required by paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, and notwithstanding the rate described in subdivisions (b) and (l), the rate paid to an emergency caregiver on behalf of a child or nonminor dependent placed with the emergency caregiver shall be equivalent to, and paid in the same manner as, the rate developed pursuant to the Tiered Rate Structure, as established in paragraph (4) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461.

(g) (1) If the application for resource family approval is approved, the funding source for the placement shall be changed to AFDC-FC or the Approved Relative Caregiver Funding
 Program, as appropriate and consistent with existing eligibility requirements.

(2) If the application for resource family approval is denied, eligibility for funding pursuant to this section shall be terminated.

(h) A county shall not be liable for any federal disallowance or penalty imposed on the state as a result of a county’s action in reliance on the state’s instruction related to implementation of this section.

(i) (1) For the 2018–19 and 2019–20 fiscal years, the department shall determine, on a county-by-county basis, whether the timeframe for the resource family approval process resulted in net assistance costs or net assistance savings for assistance payments, pursuant to this section.

(2) For the 2018–19 and 2019–20
 fiscal years, the department shall also consider, on a county-by-county basis, the impact to the receipt of federal Title IV-E funding that may result from implementation of this section.

(3) The department shall work with the California State Association of Counties to jointly determine the timeframe for subsequent reviews of county costs and savings beyond the 2019–20 fiscal year.

(j) (1) The department shall monitor the implementation of this section, including, but not limited to, tracking the usage and duration of Emergency Assistance Program payments made pursuant to this section and evaluating the duration of time a child or nonminor dependent is in a home pending resource family approval.

(2) The department may request information or data necessary to oversee the implementation of this
 section until data collection is available through automation. Pending the completion of automation, information or data collected manually shall be determined in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California.

(k) An appropriation shall not be made pursuant to Section 15200 for purposes of implementing this section.

(l) (1) On and after July 1, 2019, each county shall provide a payment equivalent to the resource family basic level rate of the home-based family care rate structure, pursuant to Section 11463, on behalf of an Indian child, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 224.1, placed in the home of the caregiver who is pending approval as a tribally approved home, as defined in subdivision (r) of Section 224.1, if all of the following criteria are met:

(A) The placement is made pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 309, Section 361.45, Section 727.05, or clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 319.

(B) The caregiver has been assessed pursuant to Section 361.4.

(C) The child is not otherwise eligible for AFDC-FC or the Approved Relative Caregiver Funding Program, pursuant to Section 11461.3, while placed in the home of the caregiver.

(D) The child resides in California.

(E) The tribe or tribal agency has initiated the process for the home to become tribally approved.

(F) An application for the Emergency Assistance Program has been completed by the placing agency.

(2) The beginning date of aid for payments made pursuant to this subdivision shall be the date of placement.

(3) The funding source for the placement shall be changed to AFDC-FC or the Approved Relative Caregiver Funding Program, as appropriate and consistent with existing eligibility requirements, when the caregiver is approved as a tribally approved home. If the approval is denied, payments made pursuant to this subdivision shall cease.

(4) Subdivision (e) and subdivisions (h) to (k), inclusive, shall apply to payments made pursuant to this subdivision.

(m) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department
 may implement and administer this section through an all-county letter or similar instructions, which shall include instructions regarding the eligibility standards for emergency assistance until regulations are adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 29.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11461.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a tribe that has entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1 may elect to participate in the Tribal Approved Relative Caregiver Funding Program.

(b) (1) In return for the care and supervision of a child placed with an approved relative caregiver, a participating tribe shall pay the approved relative caregiver a per child per month rate that, when added to the tribal Temporary Aid to Needy Families (tribal TANF) benefit received by the approved relative caregiver on behalf of the child, shall equal the rate established for the child’s assessed level of care, as set forth in subdivision (g) of Section 11461 and in Section 11463, or, on and after the date required by paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, the rate developed pursuant to the Tiered Rate Structure, as established in subdivision (h) of Section 11461, as applicable.

(2) Payments made pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be made only if all of the following conditions exist:

(A) The tribe has notified the department in writing of its decision to participate in the program, consistent with subdivision (c).

(B) The child has been removed from the parent or guardian and has been placed into the placement and care responsibility of the tribal child welfare agency pursuant to a voluntary placement
 agreement or by the tribal court, consistent with the tribe’s Title IV-E agreement.

(C) The child resides within California.

(D) The caregiver is receiving tribal TANF payments, or an application for tribal TANF has been made, on behalf of the child.

(E) The child is not eligible for AFDC-FC while placed with the approved relative caregiver because the child is not eligible for federal financial participation in the AFDC-FC payment.

(3) Any income or benefits received by an eligible child, or by the approved relative caregiver on behalf of an eligible child, which would be offset against a payment made to a foster care provider, shall be offset from the amount paid by the tribe under the program. This paragraph shall not apply to any tribal TANF
 payments received on behalf of an eligible child.

(4) An approved relative caregiver receiving payments on behalf of a child pursuant to this section shall not be eligible to receive CalWORKs payments on behalf of the same child under Section 11450.

(5) To the extent permitted by federal law, payments received by the approved relative caregiver from the program shall not be considered income for the purpose of determining other public benefits.

(6) Paragraph (1) shall not be interpreted to prevent any participating tribe from supplementing the payment made to the approved relative caregiver with any tribal optional program, including, but not limited to, a specialized care increment or a clothing allowance.

(c) A tribe electing to participate in the
 program shall notify the department of that fact in writing at least 60 days prior to the date the tribe will begin participation. As a condition of participation, the tribe shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide to the department the tribal TANF maximum aid payment (MAP) rate in effect at the time that the tribe elects to participate in the program, consistent with the tribe’s approved tribal TANF plan.

(2) Agree to recoup overpayments to an approved relative caregiver utilizing the standards for determining whether an overpayment is recoupable, and the processes for overpayment recoupment, that are applicable to overpayments as described in the tribe’s Title IV-E agreement entered into pursuant to Section 10553.1.

(3) Agree to make child support referrals for program cases, consistent with processes applied by
 the tribe to Title IV-E program cases.

(d) The following funding shall be used for the program:

(1) The tribe’s applicable per-child tribal TANF grant.

(2) General Fund resources specified in the annual Budget Act.

(e) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Program” means the Tribal Approved Relative Caregiver Funding Program established in this section.

(2) “Relative” means an adult who is related to the child by blood, adoption, or affinity within the fifth degree of kinship, including stepparents, stepsiblings, and all relatives whose status is preceded by the words “great,” “great-great,”
 or “grand,” or the spouse of any of these persons even if the marriage was terminated by death or dissolution, or as otherwise established consistent with the tribe’s Title IV-E agreement.

(3) “Tribe” means a federally-recognized Indian tribe, consortium of tribes, or tribal organization with an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 27.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11461.5.

(a) The department may establish a rate to supplement the basic rate specified in subdivision (a) of Section 11461 for the provision of additional shelter needs for AFDC-FC children who are placed in out-of-home care with their siblings.

(b) The department shall develop regulations for the rate specified in subdivision (a).

(c) The department shall amend the state plan to receive appropriate funding from the federal
 government, for implementation of this section, under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act, Part E (commencing with Section 670) of Subchapter 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code. The plan amendment shall be submitted within 90 days of notification that federal funds are available for the purposes of this section.

(d) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be implemented only if, and upon the date that, the director executes a declaration, that shall be retained by the director, stating that the director has determined that the federal government has approved the state plan amendments required by subdivision (c), and federal funding in accordance with those state plan amendments becomes available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 663, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11461.6.

(a) The Emergency Child Care Bridge Program for Foster Children is hereby established, to be implemented at the discretion of each county, for the purpose of stabilizing foster children with families at the time of placement by providing a time-limited payment or voucher for childcare following the child’s placement, or for a child whose parent is in foster care, and by providing the family with a childcare navigator to assist the family in accessing long-term subsidized childcare.

(b) The Emergency Child Care Bridge Program for Foster Children shall be administered by county welfare departments that choose to participate in the program.

(c) (1) As determined by the county
 welfare department, and consistent with guidance issued by the State Department of Social Services, counties may establish local priorities and may either provide payment directly to the family or childcare provider, or contract with a local alternative payment program to distribute vouchers for childcare.

(2) If the market rate survey is used to set reimbursement rates, counties that elect to provide payment directly to a family or childcare provider shall pay commensurate with the regional market rates, as described in Section 10374.5.

(3) The
 market rate survey is used to set reimbursement rates, counties that elect to contract with a local alternative payment agency, as described in Section 10225, to distribute childcare vouchers, the vouchers shall be in an amount commensurate with the regional market rates, as described in Section 10374.5, and the contract shall not displace, or result in the reduction of, an existing contract with a current local alternative payment program.

(d) (1) Participating county welfare departments shall determine eligibility of a child for the Emergency Child Care Bridge Program for Foster Children using the criteria outlined in paragraphs (2) and (3).

(2) Family placements eligible to receive payment or a voucher for childcare include both of the following:

(A) Approved resource
 families, as described in Section 16519.5 of this code and Section 1517 of the Health and Safety Code, and families that have a child placed with them in an emergency or for a compelling reason, as described in Section 16519.5.

(B) Parents under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, including, but not limited to, nonminor dependent parents.

(3) A participating county welfare department may provide a payment or voucher if work or school responsibilities preclude resource families from providing care when the child for whom they have care and responsibility is not in school or for periods when the family, as described in paragraph (2), is required to participate, without the child, in activities associated with parenting a child that are beyond the scope of ordinary parental duties, including, but not limited to, attendance at administrative or judicial reviews, case conferences,
 and family training.

(e) Each child receiving a monthly childcare payment or voucher shall be provided with a childcare navigator, pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 10219, who shall work directly with the child’s family, social worker, and the child and family team to assist in accessing childcare at the time of placement as well as long-term, subsidized childcare for the child, as necessary.

(f) Each child receiving a monthly childcare payment or voucher shall be eligible to receive the payment or voucher for up to six months. If the child and family access long-term, subsidized childcare prior to the end of the six-month period covered by the payment or voucher, eligibility for the monthly payment or voucher shall terminate upon enrollment in long-term, subsidized childcare.

(g) (1) Eligibility for the monthly payment or voucher may be extended beyond the initial six-month period for an additional six-month period, not to exceed 12 months in total, at the discretion of the county welfare department, if the child and family have been unable to access long-term, subsidized childcare during the initial six-month period.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the county welfare department may extend eligibility for the monthly payment or voucher beyond 12 months based on a compelling reason that may include, but is not limited to, the inability of the foster child to successfully transition to other subsidized childcare, the loss of the payment or voucher would jeopardize a successful reunification or permanency plan, or other reasons authorized pursuant to guidance issued by the department, with input from stakeholders. This paragraph shall become operative September 1, 2022.

(h) The department shall seek all federal approvals necessary to claim federal reimbursement under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act in order to maximize state and local funding for childcare.

(i) This section shall not be interpreted to create an entitlement to a childcare payment or voucher.

(j) The program established pursuant to this section is intended to complement county child welfare agency efforts to recruit, retain, and support resource families as described in Section 16003.5, and any funding provided to counties pursuant to this section shall supplement those county activities to support the goals of Chapter 773 of the Statutes of 2015 and Chapter 612 of the Statutes of 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 41, Sec. 21.   (AB 116)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11462.

(a) The department shall commence development of a new payment structure for short-term residential therapeutic program placements claiming Title IV-E funding, in consultation with county placing agencies and providers.

(b) The department shall develop a rate system that includes consideration of all of the following factors:

(1) Core services, made available to children and nonminor dependents either directly or secured through formal agreements with other agencies, which are trauma informed and culturally relevant and include:

(A) Specialty mental health services for children who meet medical necessity criteria for specialty mental
 health services under the Medi-Cal Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic, and Treatment program.

(B) Transition support services for children, youth, and families upon initial entry and placement changes and for families who assume permanency through reunification, adoption, or guardianship.

(C) Educational and physical, behavioral, and mental health supports, including extracurricular activities and social supports.

(D) Activities designed to support transition-age youth and nonminor dependents in achieving a successful adulthood.

(E) Services to achieve permanency, including supporting efforts to reunify or achieve adoption or guardianship and efforts to maintain or establish relationships with parents, siblings, extended family members, tribes, or
 others important to the child or youth, as appropriate.

(F) When serving Indian children, as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 224.1, the core services described in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, which shall be provided to eligible children consistent with active efforts pursuant to Section 361.7.

(G) (i) Facilitating the identification and, as needed, the approval of resource families pursuant to Section 16519.5, for the purpose of transitioning children and youth to family-based care.

(ii) If a short-term residential therapeutic program elects to approve and monitor resource families directly, the program shall comply with all laws applicable to foster family agencies, including, but not limited to, those set forth in the Community Care Facilities Act (Chapter 3 (commencing
 with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

(iii) For short-term residential therapeutic programs that elect to approve and monitor resource families directly, the department shall have all the same duties and responsibilities as those programs have for licensed foster family agencies, as set forth in applicable law, including, but not limited to, those set forth in the Community Care Facilities Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

(2) The core services specified in subparagraphs (A) to (G), inclusive, of paragraph (1) are not intended to duplicate services already available to foster children in the community, but to support access to those services and supports to the extent they are already available. Those services and supports may include, but are not limited to, foster youth services available
 through county offices of education, Indian Health Services, or school-based extracurricular activities.

(3) Specialized and intensive treatment supports that encompass the elements of nonmedical care and supervision necessary to meet a child’s or youth’s safety and other needs that cannot be met in a family-based setting.

(4) Staff training.

(5) Health and Safety Code requirements.

(6) Accreditation that includes:

(A) Provision for all licensed short-term residential therapeutic programs to obtain and maintain in good standing accreditation from a nationally recognized accreditation agency, as identified by the department, with expertise in programs for children or youth group care
 facilities, as determined by the department.

(B) Promulgation by the department of information identifying that agency or agencies from which accreditation shall be required.

(C) Provision for timely reporting to the department of any change in accreditation status.

(D) Provision for reduction or revocation of the rate in the event of the suspension, lapse, revocation, or other loss of accreditation, or failure to provide proof of that accreditation to the department upon request.

(7) Mental health certification, including a requirement to timely report to the department any change in mental health certificate status.

(8) Maximization of federal financial participation under Title IV-E and
 Title XIX of the Social Security Act.

(c) The department shall establish rates pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) commencing January 1, 2017. The rate structure shall include an interim rate, a provisional rate for new short-term residential therapeutic programs, and a probationary rate. The department may issue a one-time reimbursement for accreditation fees incurred after August 1, 2016, in an amount and manner determined by the department in written directives.

(1) (A) Unless the Tiered Rate Structure established in subdivision (h) of Section 11461 applies to a child or nonminor dependent, initial interim rates developed pursuant to this section shall be
 effective January 1, 2017, to December 31, 2028, inclusive, or 24 months from the date required by paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, whichever is later.

(B) The initial interim rates developed pursuant to this paragraph shall not be lower than the rates proposed as part of the Governor’s 2016 May Revision.

(C) The initial interim rates set forth in written directives or regulations pursuant to paragraph (3) shall become inoperative on January 1, 2029, inclusive, or 24 months after the date required by paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, whichever is later.

(2) Consistent with Section 11466.01, for provisional and probationary rates, the following shall be established:

(A) Terms and conditions, including the duration of the rate.

(B) An
 administrative review process for rate determinations, including denials, reductions, and terminations.

(C) An administrative review process that includes a departmental review, corrective action, and a protest with the department. Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), this process shall be disseminated by written directive pending the promulgation of regulations.

(3) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the initial interim rates, provisional rates, and probationary rates and the manner in which they are determined shall be set forth in written directives until regulations are adopted.

(d) The department shall develop a system of governmental monitoring and oversight that shall be carried out in coordination with the State Department of Health Care Services. Oversight responsibilities shall include, but not be limited to, ensuring conformity with federal and state law, including program, fiscal, and health and safety audits and reviews. The state agencies shall attempt to minimize duplicative audits and reviews to reduce the administrative burden on providers.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding the rates established pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, the care and supervision rate paid on behalf of a child or nonminor dependent placed in a short-term residential therapeutic program on or after the date required by paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section
 11461 shall be based on the Tiered Rate Structure established in subdivision (h) of Section 11461.

(2) Provided all federal and state rate and licensing requirements are met, the per child per month care and supervision rate, as set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, for a child or nonminor dependent placed in a short-term residential therapeutic program shall include a rate, according to the child’s or nonminor dependent’s tier, as determined by the child’s or nonminor dependent’s periodic IP-CANS assessment, for administrative and other activities described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 11460, according to the following tiered schedule:

Tier 1: $1610

Tier 2: $2634

Tier 3: $2634 [Ages 0-5]

Tier 3+: $7213 [Ages 6+]

(3) Beginning July 1, 2028, and on July 1 of each fiscal year thereafter, the rate set forth in paragraph (2), shall be adjusted by the annual percentage change in the California Necessities Index applicable to the calendar year within which each July 1 occurs.

(4) In addition to the care and supervision rate, provided a short-term residential therapeutic program is certified by the department as an immediate needs provider, a presumption exists that the placing agency will contract with the short-term therapeutic residential program to provide services and supports using the Immediate Needs Funding for a child who is eligible for the Immediate Needs Program established in Section 16562, and who is placed in the short-term residential therapeutic residential program, unless the placing agency determines it is in the best interest of the child to receive services and supports from another certified Immediate Needs Provider.

(5) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5
 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this subdivision by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions, which shall be exempt from submission to or review by the Office of Administrative Law. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations no later than January 1, 2030.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 28.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11462.01.

(a) (1) If a program will admit Medi-Cal beneficiaries, no later than 12 months following the date of initial licensure, a short-term residential therapeutic program, as defined in subdivision (ad) of Section 11400 of this code and paragraph (18) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, shall obtain a contract, subject to an agreement on rates and terms and conditions, with a county mental health plan to provide specialty mental health services and demonstrate the ability to meet the therapeutic needs of each child, as identified in any of the following:

(A) A mental health assessment.

(B) The child’s case plan.

(C) The child’s needs and services plan.

(D) The assessment of a qualified individual, as defined in subdivision (l) of Section 16501.

(E) Other documentation demonstrating the child has a mental health need.

(2) A short-term residential therapeutic program shall comply with any other mental health program approvals required by the State Department of Health Care Services or by a county mental health plan to which mental health program approval authority has been delegated.

(b) A short-term residential therapeutic program, except as specified in subdivision (c), may accept for placement a child who meets both of the criteria in paragraphs (1) and (2) and at least one of the conditions in
 paragraph (3).

(1) The child does not require inpatient care in a licensed health facility.

(2) The child has been assessed as requiring the level of services provided in a short-term residential therapeutic program in order to maintain the safety and well-being of the child or others due to behaviors, including those resulting from traumas, that render the child or those around the child unsafe or at risk of harm, or that prevent the effective delivery of needed services and supports provided in the child’s own home or in other family settings, such as with a relative, guardian, foster family, resource family, or adoptive family. The assessment shall ensure the child has needs in common with other children or youth in the care of the facility, consistent with subdivision (c) of Section 16514.

(3) The child meets at
 least one of the following conditions:

(A) The child has been assessed, pursuant to Section 4096, as meeting the medical necessity criteria for Medi-Cal specialty mental health services, as provided for in Section 1830.205 or 1830.210 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) The child has been assessed, pursuant to Section 4096, as seriously emotionally disturbed, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 5600.3.

(C) The child requires emergency placement pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (h).

(D) The child has been assessed, pursuant to Section 4096, as requiring the level of services provided by the short-term residential therapeutic program in order to meet the child’s behavioral or therapeutic needs.

(4) Subject to the requirements of this subdivision, a short-term residential therapeutic program may have a specialized program to serve a child, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) A commercially sexually exploited child.

(B) A private voluntary placement, if the youth exhibits status offender behavior, the parents or other relatives feel they cannot control the child’s behavior, and short-term intervention is needed to transition the child back into the home.

(C) A juvenile sex offender.

(D) A child who is affiliated with, or impacted by, a gang.

(c) (1) A short-term residential therapeutic
 program that is operating as a children’s crisis residential program, as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, may accept for admission any child who meets all of the requirements set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 11462.011 and subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 4096.

(2) The primary function of a children’s crisis residential program is to provide short-term crisis stabilization, therapeutic intervention, and specialized programming in an unlocked, staff-secured setting with a high degree of supervision and structure and the goal of supporting the rapid and successful transition of the child back to the community.

(d) A foster family agency that is certified as a Medi-Cal specialty mental health provider pursuant to Section 1810.435 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations by the State Department of Health Care Services,
 or by a county mental health plan to which the department has delegated certification authority, and which has entered into a contract with a county mental health plan pursuant to Section 1810.436 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations, shall provide, or provide access to, specialty mental health services to children under its care who do not require inpatient care in a licensed health facility and who meet the medical necessity criteria for Medi-Cal specialty mental health services provided for in Section 1830.205 or 1830.210 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations.

(e) A foster family agency that is not certified as a Medi-Cal specialty mental health provider shall provide access to specialty and mental health services and other services in that program for children who do not require inpatient care in a licensed health facility and who meet any of the conditions in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b). In this situation, the
 foster family agency shall do the following:

(1) In the case of a child who is a Medi-Cal beneficiary, arrange for specialty mental health services from the county mental health plan.

(2) In all other cases, arrange for the child to receive mental health services.

(f) All short-term residential therapeutic programs shall maintain the level of care and services necessary to meet the needs, including the assessed needs and child-specific goals identified by a qualified individual pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 4096, as applicable, of the children and youth in their care and shall maintain and have in good standing the appropriate mental health program approval. If a program will admit Medi-Cal beneficiaries, the short-term residential therapeutic program shall obtain a certification to provide Medi-Cal
 specialty mental health services issued by the State Department of Health Care Services or a county mental health plan to which the department has delegated mental health program approval authority, pursuant to Section 4096.5 of this code or Section 1810.435 or 1810.436 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations. All foster family agencies that are certified as a Medi-Cal specialty mental health provider pursuant to Section 1810.435 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations shall maintain the level of care and services necessary to meet the needs of children and youth in their care and shall maintain and have in good standing the Medi-Cal specialty mental health provider certification issued by the State Department of Health Care Services or a county mental health plan to which the department has delegated certification authority.

(g) The assessments described in subparagraphs (A), (B), (C), and (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision
 (b) shall ensure the child’s individual behavioral or treatment needs are consistent with, and can be met by, the facility and shall be made by one of the following, as applicable:

(1) An interagency placement committee, as described in Section 4096, considering the recommendations from the child and family team. If the short-term residential therapeutic program serves children who are placed by county child welfare agencies and children who are placed by probation departments, the interagency placement committee shall also ensure the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 16514 have been met with respect to commonality of need.

(2) A licensed mental health professional as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 4096.

(3) An individualized education program team. For the purposes of this section, an AFDC-FC funded
 child with an individualized education program developed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 56320) of Chapter 4 of Part 30 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code that assesses the child as seriously emotionally disturbed, as defined in, and subject to, this section and recommends out-of-home placement at the level of care provided by the provider, shall be deemed to have met the assessment requirement.

(4) A qualified individual, as defined in subdivision (l) of Section 16501.

(h) (1) The short-term residential therapeutic program shall maintain documentation of the assessments required pursuant to Section 4096 for AFDC-FC funded children, except as provided for in paragraph (3) of subdivision (g). The short-term residential therapeutic program shall inform the department if the county placing agency does not provide the documentation.

(2) The approval shall be in writing and shall indicate that the interagency placement committee has determined one of the following:
